Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
CHAPTER 16 Foreign Corporation Fiduciaries

53-16-1 through 53-16-5.
[Repealed]

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 278, § 5; Ga. L. 1959, p. 174, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 276, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1474, § 8; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 53. For present law on foreign corporation fiduciaries, see Chapter 12 of Title 53; repealed by Ga. L. 1991, p. 810, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.